Massachusetts, session 194th, H1521.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 34 of chapter 121B of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by
adding the following paragraph:-
“Notwithstanding any provision in this section, the tenants of projects transferred under
this section shall, at a minimum, maintain the rights as provided under the provisions of the
federal, state, and local subsidy programs originally applicable to the project including tenant
contribution, lease terms, eviction, right to return, grievance, resident participation, preference in
hiring, and privacy rights, except as may be required to secure financing necessary for the
feasibility of the project, or to meet associated programmatic eligibility requirements subject to
clause (ii) in the following paragraph after notice to affected tenants with an opportunity to
comment. Provided further, the redevelopment shall not be the basis for re-screening of existing
of 2

tenants or termination or reduction of assistance or eviction of any tenant in a subject property,
and such a tenant shall not be considered a new admission for any purpose, including compliance
with any income targeting requirements. Provided further, such projects under this section shall
have at least the same number of low rent housing as the number of low rent housing in the
existing project.
Provided further, the requirements for such projects under this section shall be
implemented through contracts, use agreements, regulations, or other means, as determined by
the department, so long as they remain consistent with this section and all local, state and federal
subsidy programs applicable to the project pursuant to this section and delineate: (i) the roles of
the housing authority and other agencies in monitoring and enforcing compliance, including
tracking temporary and permanent displacement; (ii) how the housing authority will rehouse
tenants so there is no displacement from affordable housing programs operated by the housing
authority, and (iii) how tenants will be provided with technical assistance to allow them
meaningful input into the development of the proposed project; provided further the benefits of
any use agreement shall inure to any tenant who occupied the project at time of redevelopment or
to present or future tenants or applicants of the project, who shall have the right to enforce the
same as third-party beneficiaries provided that nothing in this section is intended to create a
separate or new administrative process of appeal or review for any grievance governed by the
lease of any tenant.
Provided further, that there shall be an opportunity for comment from tenants of such
projects to be proposed under this section and an opportunity for public comment to the owners,
controlled entities, designated private entities, or public housing authorities responsible for such
projects with adequate notice.”
of 2